South Dakota, session 2026, HB1110.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 9-13-4.1 be AMENDED:
9-13-4.1. No person individual may vote at any a municipal election unless the
person individual is registered to vote as a voter of the municipality, pursuant to chapter
12-4 and resides in, and is a resident of the municipality at the time of the election.
For the purposes of this section, a person resides in an individual is a resident of
the municipality if the person actually lives individual:
(1) Became a resident of the municipality, as defined in § 12-1-4, and continues to
live in the municipality for at least thirty consecutive days each year, is;
(2) Is a full-time postsecondary education student who resided in was a resident of the
municipality, as defined in § 12-1-4, immediately prior to leaving for the
postsecondary education, or is; or
(3) Is on active duty as a member of the armed forces whose and the individual's home
of record is within the municipality. A voter's
An individual's qualification as a resident may be challenged only in the manner
provided in § 12-18-10. No §§ 12-4-59 to 12-4-63, inclusive. An election may not be
contested on the grounds that any nonresident an individual who is not a resident of the
municipality was allowed to vote if the nonresident was individual's qualifications were not
challenged in the manner provided in § 12-18-10 §§ 12-4-59 to 12-4-63, inclusive.
Section 2. That § 13-7-4.2 be AMENDED:
13-7-4.2. No person individual may vote at any a school district election unless
the person individual is registered to vote as a voter in the school district, pursuant to
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.178.28 2 1110
chapter 12-4 and resides in, and is a resident of the school district at the time of the
election.
For the purposes of this section, a person resides in an individual is a resident of
the school district if the person actually lives individual:
(1) Became a resident of the school district, as defined in § 12-1-4, and continues to
live in the school district for at least thirty consecutive days each year, is;
(2) Is a full-time postsecondary education student who resided in was a resident of the
school district, as defined in § 12-1-4, immediately prior to leaving for the
postsecondary education, or is; or
(3) Is on active duty as a member of the armed forces whose and the individual's home
of record is within the school district. A voter's
An individual's qualification as a resident may be challenged only in the manner
provided in § 12-18-10. No §§ 12-4-59 to 12-4-63, inclusive. An election may not be
contested on the grounds that any nonresident an individual who is not a resident of the
school district was allowed to vote if the nonresident was individual's qualifications were
not challenged in the manner provided in § 12-18-10 §§ 12-4-59 to 12-4-63, inclusive.
Section 3. This Act is effective beginning December 1, 2026.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.